Utah statutes.
4-14-12.   Defenses.

(1)  As an affirmative defense to any action brought as a result of the alleged misuse or misapplication of a pesticide, a person may present evidence that as of the time of the alleged violation, the person was in compliance with label directions, this chapter, and any rules issued in accordance with this chapter.

(2)  A person is not liable for injuries resulting from the misuse or misapplication of a pesticide unless the person was negligent.



Amended by Chapter 370, 2007 General Session

